New York, session 2025-2026, S446.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (xiii) of paragraph a of subdivision 2 of 2 section 510 of the vehicle and traffic law, as added by section 1 of 3 part B of chapter 55 of the laws of 2014, is amended and a new subpara- 4 graph (xiv) is added to read as follows: 5 (xiii) of a second or subsequent conviction of a violation of section 6 twelve hundred twenty-five-c or section twelve hundred twenty-five-d of 7 this chapter committed where such person is the holder of a class DJ or 8 MJ learner's permit or a class DJ or MJ license at the time of the 9 commission of such violation and such second or subsequent violation was 10 committed within six months following the restoration of such permit or 11 license[.]; or 12 (xiv) of a third or subsequent violation, committed within a period of 13 twelve months, of section eleven hundred eleven of this chapter, of 14 subparagraph (ii) or (iii) of paragraph one of subdivision (h) of 15 section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter, section eleven hundred 16 eighty-two of this chapter, of subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred 17 seventy-four of this chapter, of section twelve hundred twelve of this 18 chapter, of any provision of article twenty-six of this chapter, of 19 section twelve hundred twenty-five-c of this chapter, of section twelve 20 hundred twenty-five-d of this chapter, or any combination of the afore- 21 said sections or articles, whether such three or more violations were 22 repetitions of the same offense or were different offenses. Such license EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01256-02-5 S. 446 2 1 shall be revoked for a period of no less than one year, in addition to 2 any other penalties authorized or imposed by any provision of law. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 4 it shall have become a law, and shall apply to offenses committed on or 5 after such effective date.